South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3204.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 26, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-26-25.  After July 1, 2027: (1) a person who receives, renews, or maintains any educator certificate authorized by the State Board of Education and issued by the State Department of Education shall hold a master's degree that meets department regulations appropriate to his teaching field and level; and (2) the board may not authorize, and the department may not issue or renew, any educator certificate to a person who does not hold such a master's degree; and (3) a school district may not employ a teacher who does not hold such a master's degree. SECTION 2.  Section 59-3-10(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B)(1) The Superintendent of Education must possess: (1)(a) the minimum of a master's degree and substantive and broad-based experience in the field of public education including, but not limited to, service as a classroom teacher, principal, other school or school district administrator, school district superintendent, or other education policy making body at either the state or local level or any combination of them; or (2)(b) the minimum of a master's degree and substantive and broad-based experience in operational and financial management in any field of expertise including, but not limited to, finance, economics, accounting, law, or business. (2) A candidate for the office of State Superintendent of Education must meet the academic and experience requirements of item (1), including having been awarded the relevant master's degree, prior to filing for candidacy, or the filing is rendered void and the name of the candidate may not appear on any primary or general election ballot for the office of State Superintendent of Education in the election for which the filing was made. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----